Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1349.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 5-604, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE5-604. Department of gaming; director; qualifications; term; conflict of interest; grounds for dismissal A. The department of gaming is established. B. The governor shall appoint a director of the department of gaming pursuant to section 38-211. The director serves at the pleasure of the governor.  To be eligible for appointment as director, a person shall not have a financial interest in a gambling operation or in the gambling industry in this state during the term of appointment. The governor may appoint an acting director if there is a vacancy in the office. C. The director and all other employees of the department are subject to title 41, chapter 4, article 4. The director is eligible to receive compensation pursuant to section 38-611. D. The employment or financial interest of any relative to the first degree of consanguinity or affinity to the director or any other employee of the department of gaming in the gambling industry in this state is grounds for the dismissal of dismissing the director or employee of the department. END_STATUTE